Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 3.02. Quarantine and Isolation of Persons with Communicable Diseases of Public Health Threat.

Effective date.

This article became effective April 12, 2004.

§ 32.1-48.05.
Application of article; determination of exceptional circumstances; regulations; duties of the State Health Commissioner not be delegated.

Upon a determination by the State Health Commissioner that exceptional circumstances exist relating to one or more persons in the Commonwealth who are known to have been exposed to or infected with or reasonably suspected to have been exposed to or infected with a communicable disease of public health threat and that such exceptional circumstances render the procedures of Article 3.01 (§

32.1-48.01

et seq.) of this chapter to be insufficient control measures or that the individuals have failed or refused to comply voluntarily with the control measures directed by the State Health Commissioner in response to a communicable disease of public health threat, the State Health Commissioner may invoke the provisions of this article relating to quarantine and isolation.

The Board of Health shall promulgate regulations for the implementation of this article that shall (i) address the circumstances that are subject to the application of Article 3.01 (§

32.1-48.01

et seq.) of this chapter and the exceptional circumstances in which this article may be invoked by the State Health Commissioner; (ii) provide procedures to assure that any quarantine or isolation is implemented in the least restrictive environment; (iii) ensure that the essential needs of persons subject to an order of isolation issued pursuant to this article shall be met, including, but not limited to, food, water, and health care, e.g., medications, therapies, testing, and durable medical equipment; (iv) provide procedures for proper notice of orders of quarantine and orders of isolation; (v) provide procedures for the State Health Commissioner to issue an emergency detention order for persons for whom he has probable cause to believe that they may fail or refuse to comply with an order of quarantine or an order of isolation; and (vi) address any other issue or procedure covered herein that the Board deems to be properly the subject of regulation.

The powers granted to the State Health Commissioner pursuant to this article shall not be delegated to or invoked by any local or district health department director. However, in the event the State Health Commissioner, duly appointed and confirmed pursuant to §

32.1-17

, shall be unable to perform his duties pursuant to this article, any Deputy Commissioner, appointed by the State Health Commissioner and approved by the Board pursuant to §

32.1-22

, shall be authorized to invoke the provisions of this article.

History.

2004, cc. 773, 1021.

Cross references.

As to exclusion of health records of any person or persons subject to an order of quarantine from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.5

.

§ 32.1-48.06.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Affected area”
means any part or the whole of the Commonwealth, which has been identified as where persons reside, or may be located, who are known to have been exposed to or infected with or who are reasonably suspected to have been exposed to or infected with a communicable disease of public health threat. “Affected area” shall include, but not be limited to, cities, counties, towns, and subsections of such areas, public and private property, buildings, and other structures.

“Communicable disease of public health threat”
means an illness of public health significance, as determined by the State Health Commissioner in accordance with regulations of the Board of Health, caused by a specific or suspected infectious agent that may be reasonably expected or is known to be readily transmitted directly or indirectly from one individual to another and has been found to create a risk of death or significant injury or impairment; this definition shall not, however, be construed to include human immunodeficiency viruses or tuberculosis, unless used as a bioterrorism weapon. “Individual” shall include any companion animal. Further, whenever “person or persons” is used herein it shall be deemed, when the context requires it, to include any individual.

“Companion animal”
means, consistent with the provisions of §

3.2-6500

, any domestic or feral dog, domestic or feral cat, nonhuman primate, guinea pig, hamster, rabbit not raised for human food or fiber, exotic or native animal, reptile, exotic or native bird, or any feral animal or any animal under the care, custody, or ownership of a person or any animal that is bought, sold, traded, or bartered by any person. Agricultural animals, game species, or any animals regulated under federal law as research animals shall not be considered companion animals for the purposes of this article.

“Isolation”
means the physical separation, including confinement or restriction of movement, of an individual or individuals who are infected with or are reasonably suspected to be infected with a communicable disease of public health threat in order to prevent or limit the transmission of the communicable disease of public health threat to other uninfected and unexposed individuals.

“Law-enforcement agency”
means any sheriff’s office, police department, adult or youth correctional officer, or other agency or department that employs persons who have law-enforcement authority that is under the direction and control of the Commonwealth or any local governing body. “Law-enforcement agency” shall include, by order of the Governor, the Virginia National Guard.

“Quarantine”
means the physical separation, including confinement or restriction of movement, of an individual or individuals who are present within an affected area, as defined herein, or who are known to have been exposed or may reasonably be suspected to have been exposed to a communicable disease of public health threat and who do not yet show signs or symptoms of infection with the communicable disease of public health threat in order to prevent or limit the transmission of the communicable disease of public health threat to other unexposed and uninfected individuals.

History.

2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2007, cc. 699, 783.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, Title 3.2 references were substituted for Title 3.1 references to conform to the title revision by Acts 2008, c. 860, effective October 1, 2008.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 699 and 783 are identical, and added the last sentence to the definition of “Affected area.”

§ 32.1-48.07.
Conditions for invoking the provisions of this article.

Prior to issuing any order of quarantine or any order of isolation pursuant to this article, the State Health Commissioner shall ensure that:

Any quarantine or isolation is implemented in the least restrictive environment necessary to contain the communicable disease of public health threat;

Any quarantined persons shall be confined separately from any isolated persons, to the maximum extent practicable;

Upon determining that any quarantined person can be reasonably believed to have become infected with a communicable disease of public health threat, the infected person shall be promptly removed from quarantine and placed in isolation;

The health and disease status of any quarantined and isolated persons shall be monitored regularly to determine if such persons require continued quarantine or isolation;

Any quarantined or isolated persons shall be immediately released from quarantine or isolation upon a determination by the State Health Commissioner that such quarantined or isolated persons pose no risk of transmitting the communicable disease of public health threat to other persons; and

The site of any quarantine or isolation shall be, to the extent practicable, safely and hygienically maintained with adequate food, clothing, health care, and other essential needs made available to the persons who are subject to any order of quarantine or isolation.

All persons subject to an order of quarantine or an order of isolation shall comply with the order and the conditions governing their quarantine or isolation.

In the case of any person who has been quarantined or isolated in a location other than a medical care facility, the State Health Commissioner shall authorize health care professionals to enter the premises of quarantine or isolation. No person, other than such authorized health care professionals, shall enter the premises of quarantine or isolation, unless authorized by the State Health Commissioner. Upon determining that any person, who has entered the premises of quarantine or isolation, poses a threat to public health and safety, the State Health Commissioner may quarantine or isolate such person.

History.

2004, cc. 773, 1021.

§ 32.1-48.08.
Declaration of quarantine.

The State Health Commissioner may declare a quarantine of any person or persons or any affected area after he finds that the quarantine is the necessary means to contain a communicable disease of public health threat as defined in §

32.1-48.06

to which such person or persons or the people of an affected area have been or may have been exposed and thus may become infected.

The State Health Commissioner shall record his findings and any information on which he has relied in making the finding required for quarantine pursuant to subsection A. The State Health Commissioner’s record of findings concerning any communicable disease of public health threat shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed in accordance with subdivision 12 of §

2.2-3705.5

.

The State Health Commissioner may order the quarantined person or persons to remain in their residences, to remain in another place where they are present, or to report to a place or places designated by the State Health Commissioner for the duration of their quarantine. An electronic device may be used to enforce any such quarantine. The Commissioner’s order of quarantine shall be for a duration consistent with the known incubation period for such disease or, if the incubation period is unknown, for a period anticipated as being consistent with the incubation period for other similar infectious agents.

History.

2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2017, c. 778.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 778 substituted “subdivision 12 of §

2.2-3705.5

” for “subdivision 17 of §

2.2-3705.5

” in subsection B.

§ 32.1-48.09.
Order of quarantine.

The State Health Commissioner shall, prior to placing any person or persons under quarantine, issue an order of quarantine that shall: (i) identify the communicable disease of public health threat that is reasonably believed to be involved and the reasons why exceptional circumstances apply and the quarantine is the necessary means to contain the risks of transmission of the disease; (ii) contain sufficient information to provide reasonable notice to persons who are affected by the order of quarantine that they are subject to the order; (iii) specify the means by which the quarantine is to be implemented; (iv) establish clearly the geographic parameters of the quarantine, if involving an affected area; (v) specify the duration of the quarantine; (vi) provide sufficient directions for compliance with the quarantine to enable persons subject to the order to comply; (vii) provide timely opportunities, if not readily available under the circumstances, for the person or persons who are subject to the order to notify employers, next of kin or legally authorized representatives and the attorneys of their choice of the situation; (viii) specify the penalty or penalties that may be imposed for noncompliance with the order of quarantine pursuant to §

32.1-27

; and (ix) include a copy of §

32.1-48.010

to inform any person or persons subject to an order of quarantine of the right to seek judicial review of the order.

No affected area shall be the subject to an order of quarantine issued by the State Health Commissioner unless the Governor, pursuant to the authority vested in him pursuant to Chapter 3.2 (§ 44-146.13 et seq.) of Title 44, has declared a state of emergency for such affected area of the Commonwealth.

The order of quarantine shall be delivered to any person or persons affected by the quarantine, in so far as practicable. However, if, in the opinion of the State Health Commissioner, the number of quarantined persons is too great to make delivery of copies of the order of quarantine to each person possible in a timely manner, or if the order of quarantine designates an affected area instead of a specific person or persons, the State Health Commissioner shall cause the order of quarantine to be communicated to the persons residing or located in the affected area.

The State Health Commissioner or his legal representative shall, as soon as practicable following the issuance of an order of quarantine, file a petition seeking an ex parte court review and confirmation of the quarantine.

The petition shall be filed in the circuit court for the city or county in which the person or persons resides or is located or, in the case of an affected area, in the circuit court of the affected jurisdiction or jurisdictions.The petition shall include (i) a copy of the order of quarantine or all information contained in the State Health Commissioner’s order of quarantine in some other format and (ii) a summary of the findings on which the Commissioner relied in deciding to issue the order of quarantine.Upon receiving multiple orders of quarantine, the court may, on the motion of any party or on the court’s own motion, consolidate the cases into a single proceeding for all orders when (i) there are common questions of law or fact relating to the individual claims or rights to be determined, (ii) the claims of the consolidated cases are substantially similar, and (iii) all parties to the orders will be adequately represented in the consolidation.

Prior to the expiration of the original order of quarantine, the Commissioner may extend the duration of the original order upon finding that such an extension is necessary. The Commissioner, or his legal representative, shall, as soon as practicable following the extension of an order of quarantine, file a petition seeking court review and confirmation of the order to extend the duration of the quarantine.

In reviewing the petition for review and confirmation of the order of quarantine or an extension of the order of quarantine, the court shall give due deference to the specialized expertise of the State Health Commissioner. The court shall grant the petition to confirm or extend the quarantine upon finding probable cause that quarantine was the necessary means to contain the disease of public health threat and is being implemented in the least restrictive environment to address the public health threat effectively, given the reasonably available information on effective control measures and the nature of the communicable disease of public health threat.

The State Health Commissioner may, if he reasonably believes that public disclosure of the information contained in the order of quarantine or the petition for court review and confirmation or extension of the order of quarantine will exacerbate the public health threat or compromise any current or future criminal investigation or compromise national security, file some or all of any petition relating to an order of quarantine under seal. After reviewing any information filed under seal by the State Health Commissioner, the court shall reseal the relevant materials to the extent necessary to protect public health and safety.

The State Health Commissioner shall ensure that the protected health information of any person or persons subject to the order of quarantine shall only be disclosed in compliance with §

32.1-127.1:03

of this title and the regulations relating to privacy of health records promulgated by the federal Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.).

Any law-enforcement officer, state or local health department employee, or any other person designated by a law-enforcement officer or state or local health department employee is empowered and authorized to deliver an order of quarantine.

History.

2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2007, cc. 699, 783.

Cross references.

As to authority of police officers to deliver, serve, execute, and enforce orders of isolation and quarantine, see §

15.2-1704

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 699 and 783 are identical, and deleted “or to extend, when necessary, the duration of the quarantine” from the end of subsection D; inserted “is located or” in the first paragraph and added the final paragraph of subsection E; inserted subsection F and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; inserted “confirm or” in present subsection G; and added subsection J.

§ 32.1-48.010.
Appeal of any order of quarantine.

Any person or persons subject to an order of quarantine or a court-ordered extension of any such order pursuant to this article may file an appeal of the order of quarantine as such order applies to such person or persons in the circuit court for the city or county in which the subject or subjects of the order reside or are located or the circuit court for the jurisdiction or jurisdictions for any affected area. Any petition for appeal shall be in writing, shall set forth the grounds on which the order of quarantine is being challenged vis-a-vis the subject person or persons or affected area, and shall be served upon the State Health Commissioner or his legal representative.

A hearing on the appeal of the order of quarantine shall be held within 48 hours of the filing of the petition for appeal or, if the 48-hour period terminates on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed, the hearing shall be held on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed.In extraordinary circumstances, for good cause shown, the Commissioner may request a continuance of the hearing, which the court shall only grant after giving due regard to the rights of the affected individuals, the protection of the public health and safety, the severity of the emergency, and the availability of witnesses and evidence.

Any person appealing an order of quarantine shall have the burden of proving that he is not properly the subject of the order of quarantine.

The filing of an appeal shall not stay any order of quarantine.

Upon receiving multiple appeals of an order of quarantine that applies to a group of persons or an affected area, the court may, on the motion of any party or on the court’s own motion, consolidate the cases in a single proceeding for all appeals when (i) there are common questions of law or fact relating to the individual claims or rights to be determined; (ii) the claims of the consolidated cases are substantially similar; and (iii) all parties to the appeals will be adequately represented in the consolidation.

The circuit court shall not conduct a de novo review of the order of quarantine; however, the court shall consider the existing record and such supplemental evidence as the court shall consider relevant. The court shall conduct the hearing on an appeal of an order of quarantine in a manner that will protect the health and safety of court personnel, counsels, witnesses, and the general public and in accordance with rules of the Supreme Court of Virginia pursuant to subsection C of §

17.1-503

. The court may, for good cause shown, hold all or any portion of the hearings in camera upon motion of any party or upon the court’s own motion.

Upon completion of the hearing, the court may (i) vacate or modify the order of quarantine as such order applies to any person who filed the appeal and who is not, according to the record and the supplemental evidence, appropriately subject to the order of quarantine; (ii) vacate or modify the order of quarantine as such order applies to all persons who filed an appeal and who are not, according to the record and the supplemental evidence, appropriately subject to the order of quarantine; (iii) confirm the order of quarantine as it applies to any person or all appealing parties upon a finding that such person or persons are appropriately subject to the order of quarantine and that quarantine is being implemented in the least restrictive environment to address the public health threat effectively, given the reasonably available information on effective control measures and the nature of the communicable disease of public health threat; or (iv) confirm the order of quarantine as it applies to all persons subject to the order upon finding that all such persons are appropriately subject to the order of quarantine and that quarantine is being implemented in the least restrictive environment to address the public health threat effectively, given the reasonably available information on effective control measures and the nature of the communicable disease of public health threat.In any case in which the court shall vacate the order of quarantine as it applies to any person who has filed a request for review of such order and who is subject to such order or as it applies to all persons seeking judicial review who are subject to such order, the person or persons shall be immediately released from quarantine unless such order to vacate the quarantine shall be stayed by the filing of an appeal to the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals. Any party to the case may file an appeal of the circuit court decisions to the Court of Appeals. Parties to the case shall include any person who is subject to an order of quarantine and has filed an appeal of such order with the circuit court and the State Health Commissioner.

Appeals of any final order of any circuit court regarding the State Health Commissioner’s petition for review and confirmation or extension of an order of quarantine or any appeal of an order of quarantine by a person or persons who are subject to such order shall be appealable to the Court of Appeals, with an expedited review in accordance with the rules of the court pursuant to subsection C of §

17.1-503

.

Appeals of any circuit court order relating to an order of quarantine shall not stay any order of quarantine.

Persons requesting judicial review of any order of quarantine shall have the right to be represented by an attorney in all proceedings. If the person is unable to afford an attorney, counsel shall be appointed for the person by the circuit court for the jurisdiction in which the person or persons who are subject to the order of quarantine reside or, in the case of an affected area, by the circuit court for the jurisdiction or jurisdictions for the affected area. Counsel so appointed shall be paid at a rate established by the Supreme Court of Virginia from the Commonwealth’s criminal fund.

History.

2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2007, cc. 699, 783; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 699 and 783 are identical, and inserted “or are located” in subsection A.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, in subsection G in the second paragraph, substituted “Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals” for the first occurrence of “Supreme Court of Virginia” and “Court of Appeals” for second occurrence of “Supreme Court of Virginia”; and in subsection H, deleted “directly” following “appealable” and substituted “Court of Appeals” for “Supreme Court of Virginia.”

Cross references.

As to quarantine of individual exposed to contagious or infectious animal diseases, see §

3.2-6006

.

As to appeal of orders relating to quarantine or isolation of persons to the Virginia Supreme Court, see Rule 5:41, Rules of the Virginia Supreme Court.

§ 32.1-48.011.
Isolation may be ordered under certain exceptional circumstances; Commissioner authorized to require hospitalization or other health care.

Whenever the State Health Commissioner makes a determination of exceptional circumstances pursuant to §

32.1-48.05

and that the isolation procedures set forth in Article 3.01 (§

32.1-48.01

et seq.) of this chapter are insufficient control measures to contain a communicable disease of public health threat, the isolation procedures herein may be invoked.

The State Health Commissioner may order the isolation of a person or persons upon a finding that (i) such person or persons are infected with or may reasonably be suspected to be infected with a communicable disease of public health threat and (ii) isolation is necessary to protect the public health, to ensure such isolated person or persons receive appropriate medical treatment, and to protect health care providers and others who may come into contact with such infected person or persons.

The State Health Commissioner shall record his findings and any information on which he has relied in making the finding required for isolation pursuant to this section. The State Health Commissioner’s record of findings concerning any communicable disease of public health threat that is involved in an order of isolation shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed in accordance with subdivision 12 of §

2.2-3705.5

.

The Commissioner may order the isolated person or persons to remain in their places of residence, to remain in another place where they are present, or to report to a place or facility designated by the Commissioner for the duration of their isolation. An electronic device may be used to enforce any such isolation. The Commissioner’s order of isolation shall be for a duration consistent with the known course of such communicable disease of public health threat or, if the course of the disease is unknown or uncertain, for a period consistent with the probable course of the communicable disease of public health threat.

To the extent that persons subject to an order of isolation pursuant to this article require hospitalization or other health care services, the State Health Commissioner shall be authorized to require that such services be provided.

The State Health Commissioner shall also have the authority to monitor the medical condition of any person or persons subject to an order of isolation pursuant to this article through regular visits by public health nurses or such other means as the Commissioner shall determine to be necessary.

History.

2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2017, c. 778.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 778 substituted “subdivision 12 of §

2.2-3705.5

” for “subdivision 17 of §

2.2-3705.5

” in subsection C.

§ 32.1-48.012.
Isolation order.

The State Health Commissioner shall, prior to placing any person or persons in isolation, prepare a written order of isolation that shall: (i) identify the person or persons subject to such order of isolation; (ii) identify the site of isolation, which may, in the Commissioner’s discretion, include the residence of any isolated individual; (iii) specify the date and time that isolation is to commence; (iv) identify the communicable disease of public health threat or the suspected communicable disease of public health threat with which the person or persons are known to be infected or reasonably suspected to be infected; (v) specify the bases for isolation, including why isolation is the necessary means to contain transmission of the disease, and any conditions of the isolation; (vi) provide timely opportunities, if not readily available under the circumstances, for the person or person who are subject to the order to notify employers, next of kin or legally authorized representatives and the attorneys of their choice of the situation; (vii) specify the penalty or penalties that may be imposed for noncompliance with order of isolation pursuant to §

32.1-27

; and (viii) include a copy of §

32.1-48.013

to inform any person or persons subject to an order of isolation of the right to seek judicial review or the order.

No affected area shall be the subject of an order of isolation prepared by the State Health Commissioner unless the Governor, pursuant to the authority vested in him pursuant to Chapter 3.2 (§ 44-146.13 et seq.) of Title 44, has declared a state of emergency for such affected area of the Commonwealth.

The order of isolation shall be delivered to any person or persons affected by the isolation, in so far as practicable. However, if, in the opinion of the State Health Commissioner, the number of isolated persons is too great to make delivery of copies of the order of isolation to each person possible in a timely manner, or if the order of isolation designates an affected area instead of a specific person or persons, the State Health Commissioner shall cause the order of isolation to be communicated to the persons residing or located in the affected area.

The State Health Commissioner shall, as soon as practicable following the issuance of an order of isolation, file a petition seeking an ex parte court order to review and confirm the isolation.

The petition shall be filed in the circuit court for the city or county in which the person or persons resides or is located or, in the case of an affected area, in the circuit court of the affected jurisdiction or jurisdictions.Upon receiving multiple orders of isolation, the court may, on the motion of any party or on the court’s own motion, consolidate the cases into a single proceeding for all orders when (i) there are common questions of law or fact relating to the individual claims or rights to be determined, (ii) the claims of the cases are substantially similar, and (iii) all parties to the orders will be adequately represented in the consolidation.

The petition shall include (i) a copy of the order of isolation or all information contained in the State Health Commissioner’s order of isolation in some other format and (ii) a summary of the findings on which the Commissioner relied in determining that an order of isolation was required to contain the transmission of the communicable disease of public health threat.

Prior to the expiration of the original order of isolation, the Commissioner may extend the duration of the original order upon finding that such an extension is necessary. The Commissioner, or his legal representative, shall, as soon as practicable following the extension of an order of isolation, file a petition seeking court review and confirmation of the order to extend the duration of the isolation.

In reviewing any petition for review and confirmation or extension of the order of isolation, the court shall give due deference to the specialized expertise of the State Health Commissioner. The court shall grant the petition to confirm or extend the isolation upon finding probable cause that isolation was the necessary means and remains the least restrictive environment to address the public health threat effectively, given the reasonably available information on effective control measures and the nature of the communicable disease of public health threat.

The State Health Commissioner may, if he reasonably believes that public disclosure of the information contained in the order of isolation or the petition for review and confirmation or extension of the order of isolation will exacerbate the public health threat or compromise any current or future criminal investigation or compromise national security, file some or all of any petition to extend an order of isolation under seal. After reviewing any information filed under seal by the State Health Commissioner, the court shall reseal the relevant materials to the extent necessary to protect public health and safety.

The State Health Commissioner shall ensure that the protected health information of any person or persons subject to the order of isolation shall only be disclosed in compliance with the regulations relating to privacy of health records promulgated by the federal Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.

Any law-enforcement officer, state or local health department employee, or any other person designated by a law-enforcement officer or state or local health department employee is empowered and authorized to deliver an order of isolation.

History.

2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2007, cc. 699, 783.

Cross references.

As to authority of police officers to deliver, serve, execute, and enforce orders of isolation and quarantine, see §

15.2-1704

.

Editor’s note.

The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, referred to in subsection J above, is codified generally as 42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 699 and 783 are identical, and deleted “or if necessary, to extend” preceding “the isolation” in subsection D; inserted “is located or” in the first paragraph and added the final paragraph in subsection E; inserted subsection G and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and added subsection K.